Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Terms of Employment Generally.
§ 22.1-298.1.
(For Expiration Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 550, cl. 2) Regulations governing licensure.

As used in this section:

“Alternate route to licensure”
means a nontraditional route to teacher licensure available to individuals who meet the criteria specified in the guidelines developed pursuant to subsection N or regulations issued by the Board of Education.

“Industry certification credential”
means an active career and technical education credential that is earned by successfully completing a Board of Education-approved industry certification examination, being issued a professional license in the Commonwealth, or successfully completing an occupational competency examination.

“Licensure by reciprocity”
means a process used to issue a license to an individual coming into the Commonwealth from another state when that individual meets certain conditions specified in the Board of Education’s regulations.

“Professional teacher’s assessment”
means those tests mandated for licensure as prescribed by the Board of Education.

“Provisional license”
means a nonrenewable license issued by the Board of Education for a specified period of time, not to exceed three years, to an individual who may be employed by a school division in the Commonwealth and who generally meets the requirements specified in the Board of Education’s regulations for licensure, but who may need to take additional coursework, pass additional assessments, or meet alternative evaluation standards to be fully licensed with a renewable license.

“Renewable license”
means a license issued by the Board of Education for 10 years to an individual who meets the requirements specified in the Board of Education’s regulations.

The Board of Education shall prescribe, by regulation, the requirements for the licensure of teachers and other school personnel required to hold a license. Such regulations shall include procedures for (i) the denial, suspension, cancellation, revocation, and reinstatement of licensure; (ii) written reprimand of license holders on grounds established by the Board, in accordance with law, notice of which shall be made by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to division superintendents or their designated representatives; and (iii) the immediate and thorough investigation by the division superintendent or his designee of any complaint alleging that a license holder has engaged in conduct that may form the basis for the revocation of his license. At a minimum, such procedures for investigations contained in such regulations shall require (a) the division superintendent to petition for the revocation of the license upon completing such investigation and finding that there is reasonable cause to believe that the license holder has engaged in conduct that forms the basis for revocation of a license; (b) the school board to proceed to a hearing on such petition for revocation within 90 days of the mailing of a copy of the petition to the license holder, unless the license holder requests the cancellation of his license in accordance with Board regulations; and (c) the school board to provide a copy of the investigative file and such petition for revocation to the Superintendent of Public Instruction at the time that the hearing is scheduled. The Board of Education shall revoke the license of any person for whom it has received a notice of dismissal or resignation pursuant to subsection F of § 22.1-313 and, in the case of a person who is the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect, after all rights to any administrative appeal provided by §

63.2-1526

have been exhausted. Regardless of the authority of any other agency of the Commonwealth to approve educational programs, only the Board of Education shall have the authority to license teachers to be regularly employed by school boards, including those teachers employed to provide nursing education.

The Board of Education shall prescribe by regulation the licensure requirements for teachers who teach only online courses, as defined in § 22.1-212.23. Such license shall be valid only for teaching online courses. Teachers who hold a 10-year renewable license issued by the Board of Education may teach online courses for which they are properly endorsed.

The Board of Education’s regulations shall include requirements that a person seeking initial licensure:

Demonstrate proficiency in the relevant content area, communication, literacy, and other core skills for educators by achieving a qualifying score on professional assessments or meeting alternative evaluation standards as prescribed by the Board;

Complete study in attention deficit disorder;

Complete study in gifted education, including the use of multiple criteria to identify gifted students; and

Complete study in methods of improving communication between schools and families and ways of increasing family involvement in student learning at home and at school.

In addition, such regulations shall include requirements that:

Every person seeking initial licensure and persons seeking licensure renewal as teachers who have not completed such study shall complete study in child abuse recognition and intervention in accordance with curriculum guidelines developed by the Board of Education in consultation with the Department of Social Services that are relevant to the specific teacher licensure routes;

Every person seeking renewal of a license shall complete all renewal requirements, including professional development in a manner prescribed by the Board, except that no person seeking renewal of a license shall be required to satisfy any such requirement by completing coursework and earning credit at an institution of higher education;

Every person seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license shall provide evidence of completion of certification or training in emergency first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the use of automated external defibrillators. The certification or training program shall (i) be based on the current national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines for cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator, such as a program developed by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross, and (ii) include hands-on practice of the skills necessary to perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation. The Board shall provide a waiver for this requirement for any person with a disability whose disability prohibits such person from completing the certification or training;

Every person seeking licensure with an endorsement as a teacher of the blind and visually impaired shall demonstrate proficiency in reading and writing Braille;

Every teacher seeking an initial license in the Commonwealth with an endorsement in the area of career and technical education shall have an industry certification credential in the area in which the teacher seeks endorsement. If a teacher seeking an initial license in the Commonwealth has not attained an industry certification credential in the area in which the teacher seeks endorsement, the Board may, upon request of the employing school division or educational agency, issue the teacher a provisional license to allow time for the teacher to attain such credential;

Every person seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license shall complete awareness training, provided by the Department, on the indicators of dyslexia, as that term is defined by the Board pursuant to regulations, and the evidence-based interventions and accommodations for dyslexia;

Every person seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license with an endorsement as a school counselor shall complete training in the recognition of mental health disorder and behavioral distress, including depression, trauma, violence, youth suicide, and substance abuse;

Every person seeking initial licensure as a teacher who has not received the instruction described in subsection D of §

23.1-902

shall receive instruction or training on positive behavior interventions and supports; crisis prevention and de-escalation; the use of physical restraint and seclusion, consistent with regulations of the Board of Education; and appropriate alternative methods to reduce and prevent the need for the use of physical restraint and seclusion;

Every person seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license shall complete instruction or training in cultural competency;

Every person seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license with an endorsement in history and social sciences shall complete instruction in African American history, as prescribed by the Board; and

Every person seeking renewal of a license as a teacher shall complete training in the instruction of students with disabilities that includes (i) differentiating instruction for students depending on their needs; (ii) understanding the role of general education teachers on the individualized education program team; (iii) implementing effective models of collaborative instruction, including co-teaching; and (iv) understanding the goals and benefits of inclusive education for all students.

No teacher who seeks a provisional license shall be required to meet any requirement set forth in subdivision D 1, 3, 6, or 8 as a condition of such licensure, but each such teacher shall complete each such requirement during the first year of provisional licensure.

The Board shall issue a license to an individual seeking initial licensure who has not completed professional assessments as prescribed by the Board, if such individual (i) holds a provisional license that will expire within three months or, at the discretion of the school board and division superintendent, within six months if the individual has received a satisfactory mid-year performance review in the current school year; (ii) is employed by a school board; (iii) is recommended for licensure by the division superintendent; (iv) has attempted, unsuccessfully, to obtain a qualifying score on the professional assessments as prescribed by the Board; (v) has received an evaluation rating of proficient or above on the performance standards for each year of the provisional license, and such evaluation was conducted in a manner consistent with the Guidelines for Uniform Performance Standards and Evaluation Criteria for Teachers, Principals, and Superintendents; and (vi) meets all other requirements for initial licensure.

Each local school board or division superintendent may waive for any individual whom it seeks to employ as a career and technical education teacher and who is also seeking initial licensure or renewal of a license with an endorsement in the area of career and technical education any applicable requirement set forth in subsection C or subdivision D 2, 4, or 6.

The Board’s regulations shall require that initial licensure for principals and assistant principals be contingent upon passage of an assessment as prescribed by the Board.

The Board shall establish criteria in its regulations to effectuate the substitution of experiential learning for coursework for those persons seeking initial licensure through an alternate route as defined in Board regulations. Such alternate routes shall include eligibility for any individual to receive, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a renewable one-year license to teach in public high schools in the Commonwealth if he has:

Received a graduate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education;

Completed at least 30 credit hours of teaching experience as an instructor at a regionally accredited institution of higher education;

Received qualifying scores on the professional teacher’s assessments prescribed by the Board, including the communication and literacy assessment and the content-area assessment for the endorsement sought; and

Met the requirements set forth in subdivisions D 1 and 3.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Board (i) may provide for the issuance of a provisional license, valid for a period not to exceed three years, pursuant to subdivision D 5 or to any person who does not meet the requirements of this section or any other requirement for licensure imposed by law; (ii) shall provide for the issuance of a provisional license, valid for a period not to exceed three years, to any former member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the Virginia National Guard who has received an honorable discharge and has the appropriate level of experience or training but does not meet the requirements for a renewable license; and (iii) may provide for the issuance of a provisional license, valid for a period not to exceed three years, to any individual who has held within the last five years a valid and officially issued and recognized license or certification to teach issued by an entity outside of the United States but does not meet the requirements for a renewable license if the individual's license or certification to teach has been evaluated and verified by an entity approved by the Department.

The Board’s licensure regulations shall also provide for licensure by reciprocity:

With comparable endorsement areas for those individuals holding a valid out-of-state teaching license and national certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards or a nationally recognized certification program approved by the Board of Education. The application for such individuals shall require evidence of such valid licensure and national certification and shall not require official student transcripts;

For any spouse of an active duty or reserve member of the Armed Forces of the United States or a member of the Virginia National Guard who has obtained a valid out-of-state license, with full credentials and without deficiencies, that is in force at the time the application for a Virginia license is received by the Department. Each such individual shall establish a file in the Department by submitting a complete application packet, which shall include official student transcripts and an official copy of the military permanent assignment orders of the individual’s spouse. No service requirements or licensing assessments shall be required for any such individual. The Department shall determine and communicate such individual’s eligibility for licensure by reciprocity within 15 business days of receipt of the complete application packet; and

For individuals who have obtained a valid out-of-state license, with full credentials and without deficiencies, that is in force at the time the application for a Virginia license is received by the Department. Each such individual shall establish a file in the Department by submitting a complete application packet, which shall include official student transcripts. No service requirements or licensing assessments shall be required for any such individual.

The Board shall include in its regulations an alternate route to licensure for elementary education preK-6 and an alternate route to licensure for special education general curriculum K-12. Each such alternate route to licensure shall require individuals to (i) meet the qualifying scores on the content area assessment prescribed by the Board for the endorsements sought and (ii) complete an alternative certification program that provides training in the pedagogy and methodology of the respective content or special education areas prescribed by the Board. The curriculum of any such alternative certification program shall be approved by the Board. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the Board from establishing other alternate routes to licensure.

The Board, in its regulations providing for licensure by reciprocity established pursuant to subsection K, shall (i) permit applicants to submit third-party employment verification forms and (ii) grant special consideration to individuals who have successfully completed a program offered by a provider that is accredited by the Council for the Accreditation of Educator Preparation.

The Board shall develop guidelines that establish a process to permit a school board or any organization sponsored by a school board to petition the Board for approval of an alternate route to licensure that may be used to meet the requirements for a provisional or renewable license or any endorsement. Any such alternate route may include alternatives to the regulatory requirements for teacher preparation, including alternative professional assessments and coursework. The petitioner may proffer or the Board may impose conditions in conjunction with the approval of such petition.

History.

2006, cc. 27, 349; 2008, cc. 474, 827; 2012, c. 365; 2013, cc. 498, 530, 588, 650; 2014, c. 79; 2015, cc. 385, 562; 2016, cc. 389, 649; 2017, cc. 240, 247, 255, 520, 688, 783; 2018, cc. 711, 745, 746, 747, 748, 749; 2019, cc. 63, 407, 409, 587; 2020, cc. 513, 640, 870; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 23, 24, 451, 452; 2022, cc. 545, 546, 656, 657.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 104, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Board of Education may grant a two-year extension of the license of any individual licensed by the Board of Education pursuant to its authority in subsection B of
§ 22.1-298.1 of the Code of Virginia whose license expires on June 30, 2022, in order to provide the individual with sufficient additional time to complete the requirements for licensure or license renewal.”

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 498 and 530, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education, in conjunction with the Department of Health, shall adopt regulations and establish guidelines to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2016, c. 649, cl. 2, which added subdivision D 8, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, c. 688, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Education shall analyze the current requirements for teacher licensure by reciprocity in the Commonwealth, including the statutory and regulatory requirements for such licensure, and report its findings, including any recommendations for changes to such requirements, to the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health no later than November 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, c. 783, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on September 1, 2017.”

Acts 2018, cc. 748 and 749, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall amend its regulations for the establishment of requirements for teacher licensure renewal set forth in 8VAC20-22-110 to require teachers to complete no more than 360 professional development points within the 10-year license renewal period established by this act.”

Acts 2018, cc. 748 and 749, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Education and the Board of Education shall report to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Education and the Senate Committees on Finance and Education and Health on the effects of the provisions of this act by July 1, 2019.”

Acts 2019, c. 409, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall develop guidelines as required by subsection M [now subsection N] of § 22.1-298.1 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, no later than December 1, 2019.”

Acts 2019, c. 767, cl. 2 provides: “That, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Board of Education shall provide for the issuance of a three-year license to solely teach career and technical education courses or dual enrollment courses at public high schools in the Commonwealth to any individual who (i) is employed as an instructor by an institution of higher education that is accredited by a nationally recognized regional accreditation body, (ii) is teaching in the specific career and technical education or dual enrollment subject area at such institution in which the individual seeks to teach at a public school, and (iii) complies with the requirements set forth in subdivisions D 1 and 3 of § 22.1-298.1 of the Code of Virginia. The Board of Education shall require any such instructor to maintain continuous employment in such position at the institution of higher education as a condition of continued licensure. The provisions of this enactment shall expire on July 1, 2021, however, any license issued pursuant to this act prior to July 1, 2021, shall remain in effect for three years from the date it was issued unless such license is revoked by the Board of Education.”

Acts 2020, c. 870, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 394, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Board of Education shall grant a two-year extension of the license of any individual licensed by the Board of Education pursuant to its authority in subsection B of § 22.1-298.1 of the Code of Virginia whose license expires on June 30, 2021, in order to provide the individual with sufficient additional time to complete the requirements for licensure.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, cl. 13 provides: “That the requirement that every person seeking renewal of a license as a teacher shall complete training in the instruction of students with disabilities that includes (i) differentiating instruction for students depending on their needs; (ii) understanding the role of general education teachers on the individualized education program team; (iii) implementing effective models of collaborative instruction, including co-teaching; and (iv) understanding the goals and benefits of inclusive education for all students, as set out in § 22.1-298.1 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by the act, shall have a delayed effective date of July 1, 2022.”

Acts
2022, c. 104, effective April 6, 2022, provides: “The Board of Education may grant a two-year extension of the license of any individual licensed by the Board of Education pursuant to its authority in subsection B of
§ 22.1-298.1 of the Code of Virginia whose license expires on June 30, 2022, in order to provide the individual with sufficient additional time to complete the requirements for licensure or license renewal.”

Acts
2022, cc. 549 and
550, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective beginning with the 2024-2025 school year.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 474 and 827 are nearly identical, and inserted the second and third sentences in subsection B; and substituted “and persons seeking licensure renewal as teachers who have not completed such study” for “or persons seeking licensure renewal as teachers for the first time” in subdivision D 2.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 365 added the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 498 and 530 are identical, and added subdivision D 4, redesignated former subdivision D 4 as D 5, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and deleted the last paragraph in subsection B, which read: “Notwithstanding the provisions of this section and the Board’s authority to license teachers, local school boards shall be authorized to issue valid, three-year local eligibility licenses pursuant to § 22.1-299.3.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 79 added the definition of “Industry certification credential” and subdivision D 6.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 385 in the definition for “Industry certification credential” in subsection A, substituted “an active career” for “a career” and “professional license in the Commonwealth” for “state professional license”; substituted “the Commonwealth” for “Virginia” in the definitions for “Licensure by reciprocity” and “Provisional license” in subsection A; in subdivision D 6, substituted “an initial license in the Commonwealth” for “initial licensure” and added the second sentence; and inserted “pursuant to subdivision D 6 or” in subsection G.

The 2015 amendment by c. 562 added subdivision D 4 and redesignated former subdivisions D 4 through D 6 as subdivisions D 5 through D 7.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 389, in subsection G, inserted “(i)” and added clause (ii).

The 2016 amendment by c. 649, effective July 1, 2017, added subdivision D 8.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 240, in subsection B, added “and procedures for the immediate and thorough investigation by the division superintendent or his designee of any complaint alleging that a license holder has engaged in conduct that may form the basis for the revocation of his license” at the end of the second sentence, added the third sentence and inserted “administrative” in the fourth sentence.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 247 and 255 are identical, added subsection E, and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment by c. 520 added subdivision D 9 and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment by c. 688, in subdivision I 2, substituted “Other” for “however, other” and inserted “but any such individual shall be exempt from any professional teacher’s assessment requirements, subject to the approval of the division superintendent or the school board in the school division in which such individual is employed” in the last sentence.

The 2017 amendment by c. 783, effective September 1, 2017, in subdivision D 5, added clause (ii), and made a related change.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 711, in subsection H, added the second sentence, and added subdivisions H 1 through H 4.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 745 and 746 are identical, and added subdivision J 2, deleted subdivision J 3, which read “3. The Board may include other provisions for reciprocity in its regulations”; and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment by c. 747 added subsection L.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 748 and 749 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “10 years” for “five years” in the definition for “Renewable license”; in the second paragraph of subsection B, substituted “10-year” for “five-year”; deleted subdivisions D 1 and 3 and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly; added subsection E and redesignated the subsections accordingly; in subsection F, substituted “D 2, 4, or 6” for “D 1, 3, 4, 6, or 8” at the end; rewrote subdivision J 3; deleted former subdivision J 3; and added subsection K.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 63 and 407 are identical, and in subsection A, in the definition for “’Provisional license,”’ inserted “or meet alternative evaluation standards”; rewrote subdivision C 1, which read: “Complete professional assessments as prescribed by the Board of Education”; added subsection F and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by c. 409, in subsection A, inserted “guidelines pursuant to subsection M or” in the definition for “Alternate route to licensure”; in subsection L, inserted “(i)” and added clause (ii); and added subsection M, which was subsequently redesignated as subsection N at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2019 amendment by c. 587, in subsection B, substituted “procedures for (i)” for “requirements for,” inserted clause (ii), substituted “and (iii) the” for “and procedures for the”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 513 inserted “on grounds established by the Board, in accordance with law” in subsection B, first paragraph, second sentence, clause (ii).

The 2020 amendment by c. 640 added “or, at the discretion of the school board and division superintendent, within six months if the individual has received a satisfactory mid-year performance review in the current school year” in subsection F in clause (i).

The 2020 amendments by c. 870 added subdivision D 8 and in subsection E, substituted “subdivision D 1, 3, 6, or 8” for “subdivision D 1, 3, or 6.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 23 and 24, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added subdivisions D 9 and 10 and made related changes.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 451 and 452, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added subdivision D 9, which was subsequently redesignated as subdivision D 10 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 545 and 546 are identical, and deleted “of Education” following “Department” in subdivision D 6; in subdivision K 2, deleted “of Education” following “Department” throughout, in the first sentence, inserted “or reserve” and substituted “or a member of the Virginia National Guard who has obtained” for “or the Commonwealth who has obtained”, added “and an official copy of the military permanent assignment orders of the individual’s spouse” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 549 and 550 are identical, and added the second sentence in subdivision C 1; added subdivision D 12; added the second sentence in subdivision I 3; and in the first sentence of subsection L, substituted “preschool through grade six” for “preK-6” and substituted “kindergarten through grade 12” for “K-12.”

The 2022 amendments by cc. 656 and 657 are identical, and
in subsection J deleted “and” at the end of clause (i), inserted “and” at the end of clause (ii), and added clause (iii).

Law Review.

For comment, “The First Amendment and Licensing Biology Teachers in Creationism,” see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (1983).